test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_ruonas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - mielgâs+v1:
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: mielˊgâsân
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: mielˊgâsist
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: mielˊgâsáin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: mielˊgâsttáá
    mielgâs+v1+N+Ess: mieˊlgâsin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Par: mieˊlgâsid
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: mielˊgâseh
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: mielˊgâsij
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: mielˊgâsijd
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: mielˊgâsáid
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: mielˊgâsijn
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: mielˊgâsijguin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: mielˊgâsijttáá

  Noun - ruonâs+v1:
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: ruonˊnâsân
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: ruonˊnâsist
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: ruonˊnâsáin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: ruonˊnâsttáá
    ruonâs+v1+N+Ess: ruoˊṇâsin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Par: ruoˊṇâsid
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: ruonˊnâseh
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: ruonˊnâsij
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: ruonˊnâsijd
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: ruonˊnâsáid
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: ruonˊnâsijn
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: ruonˊnâsijguin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: ruonˊnâsijttáá

  Noun - suormâs+v1:
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: suorˊmâsân
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: suorˊmâsist
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: suorˊmâsáin
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: suorˊmâsttáá
    suormâs+v1+N+Ess: suoˊrmâsin
    suormâs+v1+N+Par: suoˊrmâsid
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: suorˊmâseh
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: suorˊmâsij
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: suorˊmâsijd
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: suorˊmâsáid
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: suorˊmâsijn
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: suorˊmâsijguin
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: suorˊmâsijttáá

  Noun - siärvus+v1:
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Gen: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Acc: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Ill: siärˊvusân
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Loc: siärˊvusist
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Com: siärˊvusáin
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Abe: siärˊvusttáá
    siärvus+v1+N+Ess: siäˊrvusin
    siärvus+v1+N+Par: siäˊrvusid
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Nom: siärˊvuseh
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Gen: siärˊvusij
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Acc: siärˊvusijd
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Ill: siärˊvusáid
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Loc: siärˊvusijn
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Com: siärˊvusijguin
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Abe: siärˊvusijttáá

  Noun - čiepâs: # ok, MLO
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Nom: čiepâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Gen: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Acc: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Ill: čiepˊpâsân
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Loc: čiepˊpâsist
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Com: čiepˊpâsáin
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Abe: čiepˊpâsttáá
    čiepâs+N+Ess: [čieˊpâsin, čiepˊpâsin]
    čiepâs+N+Par: [čieˊpâsid, čiepˊpâsid]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Nom: čiepˊpâseh
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Gen: čiepˊpâsij
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Acc: čiepˊpâsijd
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Ill: čiepˊpâsáid
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Loc: čiepˊpâsijn
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Com: čiepˊpâsijguin
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Abe: čiepˊpâsijttáá

  Noun - njuođâs: # ok, MLO
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuotˊtâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuotˊtâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuotˊtâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: njuoˊđâsin
    njuođâs+N+Par: njuoˊđâsid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: njuotˊtâseh
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: njuotˊtâsij
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: njuot'tâsijd
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: njuot'tâsáid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: njuot'tâsijn
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: njuot'tâsijguin
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: njuot'tâsijttáá
